Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1632
Health director; powers; duties.

The health director of a county, district, or city-county health department shall have the power and duty to (1) be the executive officer of the local boards of health; (2) appoint, subject to any applicable county or city civil service laws, rules, or regulations, a properly functioning staff and other personnel as may be necessary, whose qualifications shall conform to the United States Public Health Standards and whose remuneration shall conform to an established compensation schedule set by such local board of health and which is reviewed and approved annually by such board; (3) issue and enforce community-wide directed health measures. The health director shall receive approval of such directed health measures in writing prior to issuance by a majority of the publicly elected representatives of the county board or, in the case of a city-county health department, written approval by a majority of the publicly elected representatives of the city council, and such directed health measures shall be submitted to the board of health for ratification at a regular or emergency meeting of the board. Any duties required to be carried out by a public body under this subdivision may be completed using virtual conferencing when permitted under subsection (7) of section 84-1411. For purposes of this subdivision, written or in writing includes electronic records or documents; (4) review annually, with the local board of health, the proposed budget of the department; (5) organize, with the approval of the local board of health, a citizens' advisory health council that will aid in developing a public health program to meet the particular needs, hazards, and problems of the health district; and (6) organize, with the approval of the local board of health, a medical and dental advisory committee.

Laws 1943, c. 152, § 7, p. 560;

R.S.1943, § 71-1632;

Laws 1969, c. 572, § 1, p. 2318;

Laws 1969, c. 151, § 9, p. 717;

Laws 1975, LB 139, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 198, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 783, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 185, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB203, § 3.
July 18, 2026